North Carolina, session 2025, SB856.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. COMPENSATION AND ALLOWANCE MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 1.(a) Section 16 of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 16. Compensation Limitations on compensation and allowances.
(1) The members and officers of the General Assembly shall receive compensation for
their services the compensation and allowances prescribed by law. An increase in the
compensation or allowances of members shall become effective at the beginning of the next
regular session of the General Assembly following the session at which it was enacted.that is
equal to the average annual starting salary of North Carolina public school teachers paid from
State funds as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction which pay shall begin on
July 1 of each fiscal year. The members of the General Assembly shall receive per diem,
subsistence, and travel reimbursement that is consistent with similar allowances for State
employees.
(2) The officers of the General Assembly who are not members of the General Assembly
shall receive for their services the compensation and allowances prescribed by law."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to set the annual salary for members of the General
Assembly in an amount that is equal to the average salary for classroom teachers and to set the
travel, subsistence, and per diem rates at the rates paid for State employees."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
*S856-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.

PART II. CONSECUTIVE TERM LIMIT
SECTION 2.(a) Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 25. Limitation of consecutive terms.
(1) No person shall be eligible to serve more than 16 consecutive years as a member of
the House of Representatives. A person disqualified by this section from election to the next
succeeding term as a member of the House of Representatives may not fill a vacancy in the House
of Representatives during that term.
(2) No person shall be eligible to serve more than 16 consecutive years as a member of
the Senate. A person disqualified by this section from election to the next succeeding term as a
member of the Senate may not fill a vacancy in the Senate during that term.
(3) Terms of office beginning before January 1, 2027, shall not be considered for the
purpose of this section."
SECTION 2.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment limiting members of the General Assembly to no more
than 16 consecutive years in a chamber."
SECTION 2.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 2.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.

PART III. INCREASE TERM LENGTH FOR SENATORS
SECTION 3.(a) Section 2 of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 2. Number of Senators.
The Senate shall be composed of 50 Senators, biennially quadrennially chosen by
ballot.ballot beginning in 2028."
SECTION 3.(b) Section 8 of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 8. Elections.
The election for members of the General Assembly shall be held for the respective districts
in 1972 and every two years thereafter, 2028, at the places and on the day prescribed by law.
Thereafter, elections for members of the House of Representatives shall be held every two years
and elections for members of the Senate shall be held every four years."
SECTION 3.(c) Section 2(1) of Article III of the Constitution of North Carolina
reads as rewritten:
Page 2 Senate Bill 856-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(1) Election and term. The Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be elected by the
qualified voters of the State in 1972 and every four years thereafter, at the same time and places
as members of the General Assembly Senate are elected. Their term of office shall be four years
and shall commence on the first day of January next after their election and continue until their
successors are elected and qualified."
SECTION 3.(d) Section 7 of Article III of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 7. Other elective officers.
(1) Officers. A Secretary of State, an Auditor, a Treasurer, a Superintendent of Public
Instruction, an Attorney General, a Commissioner of Agriculture, a Commissioner of Labor, and
a Commissioner of Insurance shall be elected by the qualified voters of the State in 1972 and
every four years thereafter, at the same time and places as members of the General Assembly
Senate are elected. Their term of office shall be four years and shall commence on the first day
of January next after their election and continue until their successors are elected and qualified.
…
(3) Vacancies. If the office of any of these officers is vacated by death, resignation, or
otherwise, it shall be the duty of the Governor to appoint another to serve until his successor is
elected and qualified. Every such vacancy shall be filled by election at the first election for
members of the General Assembly House of Representatives that occurs more than 60 days after
the vacancy has taken place, and the person chosen shall hold the office for the remainder of the
unexpired term fixed in this Section. When a vacancy occurs in the office of any of the officers
named in this Section and the term expires on the first day of January succeeding the next election
for members of the General Assembly, House of Representatives, the Governor shall appoint to
fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the office.
…."
SECTION 3.(e) Section 18(1) of Article IV of the Constitution of North Carolina
reads as rewritten:
"(1) District Attorneys. The General Assembly shall, from time to time, divide the State
into a convenient number of prosecutorial districts, for each of which a District Attorney shall be
chosen for a term of four years by the qualified voters thereof, at the same time and places as
members of the General Assembly Senate are elected. Only persons duly authorized to practice
law in the courts of this State shall be eligible for election or appointment as a District Attorney.
The District Attorney shall advise the officers of justice in his district, be responsible for the
prosecution on behalf of the State of all criminal actions in the Superior Courts of his district,
perform such duties related to appeals therefrom as the Attorney General may require, and
perform such other duties as the General Assembly may prescribe."
SECTION 3.(f) Section 19 of Article IV of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 19. Vacancies.
Unless otherwise provided in this Article, all vacancies occurring in the offices provided for
by this Article shall be filled by appointment of the Governor, and the appointees shall hold their
places until the next election for members of the General Assembly House of Representatives
that is held more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, when elections shall be held to fill the
offices. When the unexpired term of any of the offices named in this Article of the Constitution
in which a vacancy has occurred, and in which it is herein provided that the Governor shall fill
the vacancy, expires on the first day of January succeeding the next election for members of the
General Assembly, House of Representatives, the Governor shall appoint to fill that vacancy for
the unexpired term of the office. If any person elected or appointed to any of these offices shall
fail to qualify, the office shall be appointed to, held and filled as provided in case of vacancies
occurring therein. All incumbents of these offices shall hold until their successors are qualified."
Senate Bill 856-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(g) The amendments set out in subsections (a) through (f) of this section
shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held
on November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to increase the terms for Senators from two to four years."
SECTION 3.(h) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (g) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendments set out in subsections (a) through (f) of this section, the
Secretary of State shall enroll the amendments among the permanent records of that office. If a
majority of votes cast on the question are against the amendments set out in subsections (a)
through (f) of this section, the amendments shall have no effect.
SECTION 3.(i) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (h) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendments set out in subsections (a) through (f) of this section, the amendments are
effective upon certification.

PART IV. SESSION LENGTH LIMITATION
SECTION 4.(a) Section 11(1) of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina
reads as rewritten:
"(1) Regular sessions.
(a) The General Assembly shall meet in regular session in 1973 and every two
years thereafter on the day prescribed by law.
(b) Odd-numbered years. – Beginning with the regular session in 2027, during an
odd-numbered year, the General Assembly shall remain in regular session for
no more than 120 calendar days, except that this period may be extended by
joint resolution once per regular session in an odd-numbered year for not more
than 10 calendar days. If the General Assembly, upon convening of the regular
session, meets initially for not more than two consecutive calendar days and
then adjourns for not less than 10 calendar days, that period of adjournment
shall be excluded from the 120 calendar days.
(c) Even-numbered years. – If the regular session meets in even-numbered years,
the General Assembly shall remain in regular session for no more than 90
calendar days, except that this period may be extended by joint resolution once
per regular session in an even-numbered year for not more than 10 calendar
days.
(d) Reconvened sessions called under Section 5 of Article III of this Constitution
and sessions required in response to orders of a court in which only matters
responding to the court order are considered shall be excluded from the
calculations of this section.
(e) Neither house shall proceed upon public business unless a majority of all of
its members are actually present.
(f) No valid action, other than a resolution of adjournment, may be taken by the
General Assembly in a regular session after the time limits prescribed in this
section have expired."
SECTION 4.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Page 4 Senate Bill 856-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Constitutional amendment limiting the length of regular legislative sessions to 120
calendar days in odd-numbered years and 90 calendar days in even-numbered years."
SECTION 4.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.

PART V. SUSPENSION OF PAY WITHOUT BUDGET PASSAGE
SECTION 5.(a) Section 16 of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 16. Compensation and allowances.
The members and officers of the General Assembly shall receive for their services the
compensation and allowances prescribed by law. An increase in the compensation or allowances
of members shall become effective at the beginning of the next regular session of the General
Assembly following the session at which it was enacted. If the General Assembly fails to ratify
by June 30 a comprehensive budget of the anticipated revenue and proposed expenditures of the
State for the ensuing fiscal period, the compensation and allowances of the members of the
General Assembly from July 1 until the earlier of the ratification of the comprehensive budget or
the commencement of the next regular session shall be forfeited."
SECTION 5.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to disallow the annual salary and other allowances for
members of the General Assembly if the General Assembly has not passed a budget by June 30
of a year for a period beginning July 1 and continuing until a budget is ratified or the term of the
Legislature ends, whichever occurs first."
SECTION 5.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 5.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 856-First Edition Page 5